North Carolina, session 2025, SB422.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 90-270.56 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-270.56. Reciprocal licenses.
The Board may shall issue a license as a marriage and family therapist or a marriage and
family therapy associate by reciprocity to any person who applies for the license as prescribed
by the Board and who at all times during the application process:
(1) Has been licensed for five two continuous years and is currently licensed as a
marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapy associate in
another state.state and has passed the Board's examination on jurisprudence
that is limited to testing the applicant's knowledge of the law and rules of this
State.
(2) Has Holds an unrestricted license in good standing in the other state.
(3) Has no unresolved complaints in any jurisdiction.
(4) Has passed the National Marriage and Family Therapy
examination.examination or has passed the clinical examination required by
the licensing board that regulates marriage and family therapy in the State of
California."
SECTION 2. G.S. 90-270.63 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-270.63. Criminal history record checks of applicants for licensure as a marriage and
family therapist and a marriage and family therapy associate.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions shall apply in this section:
(1) Applicant. – A person applying for licensure as a licensed marriage and family
therapy associate pursuant to G.S. 90-270.54A or licensed marriage and
family therapist pursuant to G.S. 90-270.54.G.S. 90-270.54 or
G.S. 90-270.56.
…."
SECTION 3. The North Carolina Marriage and Family Therapy Licensure Board
may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to applications
for licensure on or after that date.
*S422-v-1*